Massachusetts, session 194th, H2822.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32A Section 3 is hereby amended by inserting the following words after Local
254 S.E.I.U: “1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts Organization of State
Engineers and Scientists.”
of 1